Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1905.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2710 heading, (a) and (c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended by the act of December 3, 2002 (P.L.1176, No.143), declared unconstitutional, 936 A.2d 188 (Pa. Commonwealth 2007), affirmed, 951 A.2d 345 (2008), are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2710. [Ethnic] Hate-based intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of [ethnic] hate-based intimidation if, with malicious intention toward the race, color, religion [or], national origin, 1234567891011121314151617 ethnicity, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation or disability of another individual [or], group of individuals[, he commits an offense under any other provision of this article or] or a person with whom the individual or group is associated, commits a personal injury crime as defined in section 103 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, which results in bodily injury, an offense under Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction) [exclusive of section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism)] or an offense under section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass) with respect to such individual or his or her property or with respect to one or more members of such group or to their property.* * *(b.1) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit or punish religiously motivated speech or conduct that is otherwise protected by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania or the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act. SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT, LIMIT OR OTHERWISE PUNISH A PERSON IN THE FREE EXERCISE OR ENJOYMENT OF A RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE SECURED TO THE PERSON BY THE CONSTITUTION OR LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA OR LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.(c) Definition.--As used in this section "malicious intention" means the intention to commit any act, the commission of which is a necessary element of any offense referred to in subsection (a) motivated by hatred toward the race, color, religion, ethnicity, ancestry, sex, gender, gender identity, 20250HB1905PN3033 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gender expression, sexual orientation, disability or national origin of another individual or group of individuals.Section 2. Section 8309(a) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8309. Civil rights violations.(a) Redress for personal injury.--[A person](1) An individual who incurs injury to his or her person or damage or loss to his or her property as a result of conduct described in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to [ethnic] hate-based intimidation) or 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism) shall have a right of action [against the actor for] in a court of common pleas for preliminary or permanent injunction, damages or other appropriate civil or equitable relief[.] against all of the following:(i) The actor.(ii) A person who has solicited the actor to engage in the conduct.(iii) A person who has knowingly attempted to provide or provided aid to the actor with the intent that the actor engage in the conduct.(2) In the action, the issue of whether the defendant engaged in the conduct alleged shall be determined according to the burden of proof used in other civil actions for similar relief.(3) The plaintiff may seek recovery for any of the following:[(1)] (i) General and special damages, including damages for emotional distress. Damages under this paragraph shall be actual damages or $500, whichever is greater.20250HB1905PN3033 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(2)] (ii) Punitive damages.[(3)] (iii) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.[(4)] (iv) Injunctive and other equitable relief.[(5)] (v) Such other relief which the court deems necessary and proper.* * *(g) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit, limit or punish religiously motivated speech or conduct that is otherwise protected by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania or the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act. SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT, LIMIT OR OTHERWISE PUNISH A PERSON IN THE FREE EXERCISE OR ENJOYMENT OF A RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE SECURED TO THE PERSON BY THE CONSTITUTION OR LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE CONSTITUTION OF PENNSYLVANIA OR LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1905PN3033 - 4 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617